Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB220.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 243.037 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as where specifically authorized by statute, a retailer licensed to sell distilled
spirits or wine by the drink shall only be permitted to sell or serve distilled spirits
and wine by the drink at one (1) main bar, counter, or similar contrivance at the
licensed premises.
(2) A retailer may have necessary service bars, if they are not located in any room in
which the members or guests or patrons of the place are invited or permitted to
come. No distilled spirits or wine shall be served at service bars.
(3) A supplemental bar license shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve distilled
spirits and wine by the drink at retail from an additional location other than the
main bar. A supplemental bar license is a nonquota license and shall not be
transferable to other premises.
(4) The fee for a supplemental license shall be the same as the fee for the primary
license authorizing retail distilled spirits and wine drink sales for each of up to five
(5) supplemental bar licenses. There shall be no fee for each supplemental license
issued in excess of five (5) to the same licensee at the same premises.
(5) A license authorizing retail malt beverage sales, by the drink or by the package,
authorizes the licensee to sell and serve malt beverages at any location on the
licensed premises without obtaining a supplemental bar license.
(6) The holder of a small farm winery license that also holds a license to sell
alcoholic beverages by the drink at retail may sell alcoholic beverages by the
drink under the retail drink license at one (1) or more permanent or
nonpermanent locations on the licensed premises of the small farm winery
without obtaining a supplemental bar license as prescribed by this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/6/2026 9:04 AM Jacketed